New Jersey, session 221, A5704.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities or a successor agency. Covered appliance means an appliance covered under a public utility warranty program, and includes, but is not limited to:  furnaces, water heaters, solar panels, HVAC systems, heat pumps, refrigerators, stoves, dishwashers, washing machines, dryers, grills, gas fireplaces, and space heaters. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within the State. HVAC means heating, ventilation, and air conditioning. Public utility warranty program or program means a contract between a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, and an individual, wherein the public utility agrees to repair or replace a covered appliance. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, an electric public utility or gas public utility shall implement or maintain a public utility warranty program.  All contracts for public utility warranty programs shall provide coverage for the full cost to repair or replace covered appliances. c.     An electric public utility or gas public utility that maintains a public utility warranty program shall notify its customers of the program via bill insert every billing cycle for one year following the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which notice shall: (1)   inform customers, using plain language and visual design, of the elements of the public utility warranty program, including customers rights under the program; and (2)   inform customers already party to a contract under a public utility warranty program of how the new program differs from the existing program and how customers can terminate an existing contract and enroll in the new public utility warranty program. d.  The board shall not approve a request of an electric public utility or a gas public utility to recover the cost to implement a public utility warranty program pursuant to this section through the rates charged to an electric public utility or a gas public utility customer. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment and shall apply to all contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this act.